Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:(1) A juvenile firearm early intervention alternative is an alternate method of resolving cases where a person is charged in juvenile court with unlawful possession of a firearm under RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(v). For a person to qualify for a juvenile firearm early intervention alternative under this section:(a) The person must be charged in juvenile court with unlawful possession of a firearm under RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(v);(b) Within two weeks of the date charges are filed and upon agreement of the prosecutor the person must enter into an agreement with the prosecutor to pursue the juvenile firearm early intervention alternative in lieu of prosecution.(2) A juvenile firearm early intervention alternative must consist of the following:(a) A period of intensive community supervision assigned to a juvenile probation counselor with a reduced caseload for 12 months which may include a period extending beyond the 21st birthday of the participant;(b) The participant complying with all conditions of release and supervision, which may include:(i) Curfew;(ii) Geographic restrictions;(iii) Restrictions on associations with certain people;(iv) Electronic monitoring;(v) Abstaining from drugs and alcohol;(vi) School attendance; and(vii) Any other conditions deemed appropriate by the court or the juvenile probation officer to ensure the participant's success and the safety of the public;(c) The participant agreeing to waive their right to a speedy trial;(d) The participant signing a consent to allow for random, suspicionless searches of their person, vehicle, residence, and personal property during the period of supervision in order to allow the juvenile probation officer to search for firearms, firearm parts, ammunition, illegal substances, or other items that would constitute a violation of state law or the terms of the alternative;(e) The participant agreeing that the juvenile probation officer has the authority to arrest the participant, or cause the arrest of the participant without a warrant when the probation officer has probable cause to believe the participant has violated a condition of the alternative and there is a risk to public safety or to the health and welfare of the participant, pending a court hearing that considers the nature of the alleged violation or violations;(f) The participant successfully engaging in the following mandatory services:(i) Multisystemic therapy; and(ii) A credible messenger or mentorship program; and(g) The participant successfully engaging in additional appropriate services, identified by juvenile probation, which may include the following:(i) Completion of a mental health evaluation and compliance with any treatment recommendations;(ii) Completion of a substance use disorder evaluation and compliance with any treatment recommendations;(iii) Completion of an evaluation with a physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner and compliance with any medications prescribed to treat any mental health or substance use disorders; and(iv) Compliance with substance use monitoring through urinalysis, an alcohol detection breathalyzer device, a transdermal sensor device, or other technology designed to detect drugs or alcohol in a person's system.(3) During the period of the alternative, at least every three months, the court must hold a hearing, with the defendant present, to consider status reports from the juvenile probation officer detailing the participant's compliance with conditions of the alternative.(4) If the participant successfully completes the alternative, the charge must be dismissed.(5) If it appears to the prosecuting attorney that the participant is not substantially complying with all alternative conditions as reflected by a written update, the prosecuting attorney may make a motion for termination of the alternative.(a) After notice is provided to the participant, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether the alternative should be terminated.(b) Before the hearing to determine whether the alternative should be terminated, the participant and their attorney must be advised of the nature of the alleged noncompliance and provided discovery of evidence supporting the motion, including names and contact information of witnesses.(c) During the hearing to determine whether the alternative should be terminated, the court must consider the following factors:(i) The nature of the alleged noncompliance; and(ii) Any aggravating or mitigating circumstances.(d) If the court finds the participant is not substantially complying with the conditions of the alternative, the court shall provide in its written order the grounds for termination of the alternative.(6) For purposes of this section, "alternative" means the juvenile firearm early intervention alternative.Sec. 2. RCW 9.41.070 and 2021 c 215 s 94 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a county shall within thirty days after the filing of an application of any person, issue a license to such person to carry a pistol concealed on his or her person within this state for five years from date of issue, for the purposes of protection or while engaged in business, sport, or while traveling. However, if the applicant does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the previous consecutive ninety days, the issuing authority shall have up to sixty days after the filing of the application to issue a license. The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications for concealed pistol licenses during regular business hours.The applicant's constitutional right to bear arms shall not be denied, unless:(a) He or she is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal law;(b) The applicant's concealed pistol license is in a revoked status;(c) He or she is under twenty-one years of age;(d) He or she is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms pursuant to chapter 7.105 RCW, or RCW 9A.46.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.26B.020, or 26.26A.470, or any of the former RCW 10.14.080, 26.10.115, 26.50.060, and 26.50.070;(e) He or she is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense;(f) He or she has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor; or(g) He or she has been ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW 9.41.098(1)(e) within one year before filing an application to carry a pistol concealed on his or her person.No person convicted of a felony may have his or her right to possess firearms restored or his or her privilege to carry a concealed pistol restored, unless the person has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.(2)(a) The issuing authority shall conduct a check through the national instant criminal background check system, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the health care authority electronic database, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess a firearm, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal law, and therefore ineligible for a concealed pistol license.(b) The issuing authority shall deny a permit to anyone who is found to be prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal or state law.(c) (a) and (b) of this subsection apply whether the applicant is applying for a new concealed pistol license or to renew a concealed pistol license.(d) A background check for an original license must be conducted through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and shall include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation through the submission of fingerprints. The results will be returned to the issuing authority. The applicant may request and receive a copy of the results of the background check from the issuing authority. If the applicant seeks to amend or correct their record, the applicant must contact the Washington state patrol for a Washington state record or the federal bureau of investigation for records from other jurisdictions.(3) Any person whose firearms rights have been restricted and who has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c) or who is exempt under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(20)(A) shall have his or her right to acquire, receive, transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess firearms in accordance with Washington state law restored except as otherwise prohibited by this chapter.(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, email address at the option of the applicant, date and place of birth, race, gender, description, a complete set of fingerprints, and signature of the licensee, and the licensee's driver's license number or state identification card number if used for identification in applying for the license. A signed application for a concealed pistol license shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for a concealed pistol license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.The application for an original license shall include a complete set of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.The license and application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a defense to a federal prosecution.The license shall contain a description of the major differences between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law.The application shall contain questions about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 and federal law to possess a pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the applicant is a United States citizen. If the applicant is not a United States citizen, the applicant must provide the applicant's country of citizenship, United States issued alien number or admission number, and the basis on which the applicant claims to be exempt from federal prohibitions on firearm possession by aliens. The applicant shall not be required to produce a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is not a citizen of the United States shall, if applicable, meet the additional requirements of RCW 9.41.173 and produce proof of compliance with RCW 9.41.173 upon application. The license may be in triplicate or in a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing.A photograph of the applicant may be required as part of the application and printed on the face of the license.The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority issuing the license.The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement and corrections agencies, in an online format, all information received under this subsection.(5) The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the original five-year license shall be one hundred thirty-six dollars plus additional charges imposed by the federal bureau of investigation that are passed on to the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of the license.The fee shall be distributed as follows:(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;(b) Four dollars shall be paid to the agency taking the fingerprints of the person licensed;(c) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter;(d) Two dollars and sixteen cents to the firearms range account in the general fund; ((and))(e) Eighty-four cents to the concealed pistol license renewal notification account created in RCW 43.79.540; and(f) One hundred dollars to the juvenile firearm early intervention services account created in section 4 of this act.(6) The nonrefundable fee for the renewal of such license shall be one hundred thirty-two dollars. No other branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the renewal of the license.The renewal fee shall be distributed as follows:(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;(b) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter;(c) Two dollars and sixteen cents to the firearms range account in the general fund; ((and))(d) Eighty-four cents to the concealed pistol license renewal notification account created in RCW 43.79.540; and(e) One hundred dollars to the juvenile firearm early intervention services account created in section 4 of this act.(7) The nonrefundable fee for replacement of lost or damaged licenses is ten dollars to be paid to the issuing authority.(8) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the option of the issuing authority.(9)(a) A licensee may renew a license if the licensee applies for renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the license. A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license must pay a late renewal penalty of ten dollars in addition to the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section. The fee shall be distributed as follows:(i) Three dollars shall be deposited in the limited fish and wildlife account and used exclusively first for the printing and distribution of a pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety, and the preemptive nature of state law, and subsequently the support of volunteer instructors in the basic firearms safety training program conducted by the department of fish and wildlife. The pamphlet shall be given to each applicant for a license; and(ii) Seven dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.(b) Beginning with concealed pistol licenses that expire on or after August 1, 2018, the department of licensing shall mail a renewal notice approximately ninety days before the license expiration date to the licensee at the address listed on the concealed pistol license application, or to the licensee's new address if the licensee has notified the department of licensing of a change of address. Alternatively, if the licensee provides an email address at the time of license application, the department of licensing may send the renewal notice to the licensee's email address. The notice must contain the date the concealed pistol license will expire, the amount of renewal fee, the penalty for late renewal, and instructions on how to renew the license.(10) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) through (9) of this section, the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of the applicant's residence may issue a temporary emergency license for good cause pending review under subsection (1) of this section. However, a temporary emergency license issued under this subsection shall not exempt the holder of the license from any records check requirement. Temporary emergency licenses shall be easily distinguishable from regular licenses.(11) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the requirements of this section or chapter, nor may a political subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not required by this section.(12) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding citizenship or identity on an application for a concealed pistol license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the concealed pistol license of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and the person shall be permanently ineligible for a concealed pistol license.(13) A person may apply for a concealed pistol license:(a) To the municipality or to the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in a municipality;(b) To the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in an unincorporated area; or(c) Anywhere in the state if the applicant is a nonresident.(14) Any person who, as a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, is unable to renew his or her license under subsections (6) and (9) of this section because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service may renew his or her license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service, if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if appropriate, a copy of the person's discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this subsection (14) shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license under this subsection (14) shall pay only the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section and shall not be required to pay a late renewal penalty in addition to the renewal fee.(15)(a) By October 1, 2019, law enforcement agencies that issue concealed pistol licenses shall develop and implement a procedure for the renewal of concealed pistol licenses through a mail application process, and may develop an online renewal application process, for any person who, as a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, is unable to renew his or her license under subsections (6) and (9) of this section because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service.(b) A person applying for a license renewal under this subsection shall:(i) Provide a copy of the person's original order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service;(ii) Apply for renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the license; and(iii) Pay the renewal licensing fee under subsection (6) of this section, and, if applicable, the late renewal penalty under subsection (9) of this section.(c) A license renewed under this subsection takes effect on the expiration date of the prior license and is valid for a period of one year.Sec. 3. RCW 9.41.070 and 2025 c 370 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a county shall within thirty days after the filing of an application of any person, issue a license to such person to carry a concealed pistol within this state for five years from date of issue, for the purposes of protection or while engaged in business, sport, or while traveling. However, if the applicant does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the previous consecutive ninety days, the issuing authority shall have up to sixty days after the filing of the application to issue a license. The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications for concealed pistol licenses during regular business hours.A concealed pistol license application shall be issued unless the applicant is disqualified because the applicant:(a) Is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal law;(b) The applicant's concealed pistol license is in a revoked status;(c) Is under twenty-one years of age;(d) Is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms pursuant to chapter 7.105 RCW, or RCW 9A.46.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.26B.020, or 26.26A.470, or any of the former RCW 10.14.080, 26.10.115, 26.50.060, and 26.50.070;(e) Is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense;(f) Has an outstanding warrant for the applicant's arrest from any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor;(g) Has been ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW 9.41.098(1)(e) within one year before filing an application for a concealed pistol license; or(h) Has failed to produce a certificate of completion from a certified concealed carry firearms safety training program within the last five years, as provided under subsection (5) of this section and RCW 43.43.575, or proof that the applicant is exempt from the training requirement.No person convicted of a felony may have the person's right to possess firearms restored or privilege to carry a concealed pistol restored, unless the person has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.(2)(a) The issuing authority shall conduct a check through the national instant criminal background check system, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the administrative office of the courts, LInX-NW, the health care authority electronic database, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess a firearm, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal or state law, and therefore ineligible for a concealed pistol license.(b) The issuing authority shall deny a license to anyone who is found to be prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal or state law or otherwise disqualified from obtaining a concealed pistol license under the requirements of this section.(c) (a) and (b) of this subsection apply whether the applicant is applying for a new concealed pistol license or to renew a concealed pistol license.(d) A background check for an original license must be conducted through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and shall include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation through the submission of fingerprints. The results will be returned to the issuing authority. The applicant may request and receive a copy of the results of the background check from the issuing authority. If the applicant seeks to amend or correct their record, the applicant must contact the Washington state patrol for a Washington state record or the federal bureau of investigation for records from other jurisdictions. An applicant presenting a valid permit to purchase firearms is exempt from the fingerprint check requirement in a concealed pistol license application.(e)(i) If an application for a concealed pistol license is denied, the issuing authority shall send the applicant a written notice of the denial citing the specific statute under which the application is denied, and providing specific details regarding the grounds for denial in compliance with rules governing the dissemination of criminal history information. If the applicant provides an email address at the time of application, the issuing authority may send the denial notice to the applicant's email address. The written notice also must include information on the procedure for an applicant to request that the issuing authority reconsider the denial of the application.(ii) If the issuing authority after reconsideration upholds the decision to deny the application, the applicant may seek judicial relief of the denial in superior court pursuant to RCW 9.41.0975.(3) Any person whose firearms rights have been restricted and who has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c) or who is exempt under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(20)(A) shall have the person's right to acquire, receive, transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess firearms in accordance with Washington state law restored except as otherwise prohibited by this chapter.(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, email address at the option of the applicant, date and place of birth, race, gender, physical description, a complete set of fingerprints unless the applicant presents a valid permit to purchase firearms issued under RCW 9.41.121, signature of the licensee, and the licensee's driver's license number or state identification card number if used for identification in applying for the license. A signed application for a concealed pistol license shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for a concealed pistol license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.The application for an original license shall include a complete set of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol unless the applicant presents a valid permit to purchase firearms issued under RCW 9.41.121.The license and application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a defense to a federal prosecution.The license shall contain a description of the major differences between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law.The application shall contain questions about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 and federal law to possess a pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the applicant is a United States citizen. If the applicant is not a United States citizen, the applicant must provide the applicant's country of citizenship, United States issued alien number or admission number, and the basis on which the applicant claims to be exempt from federal prohibitions on firearm possession by aliens. The applicant shall not be required to produce a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is not a citizen of the United States shall, if applicable, meet the additional requirements of RCW 9.41.173 and produce proof of compliance with RCW 9.41.173 upon application. The license may be in triplicate or in a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing.A photograph of the applicant may be required as part of the application and printed on the face of the license.The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority issuing the license.The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement and corrections agencies, in an online format, all information received under this subsection.(5)(a) The training required for issuance of a license under this section must be from a concealed carry firearms safety training program certified under RCW 43.43.575 that includes live-fire shooting exercises on a firing range that include a demonstration by the applicant of the safe handling of, and shooting proficiency with, firearms, including a minimum of 50 rounds of ammunition firing training at a firing range under the supervision of an instructor.(b) Concealed pistol license applicants are exempt from the training requirement in this section if they can demonstrate they are exempt under RCW 9.41.1132(5).(6)(a) The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the original five-year license shall be one hundred thirty-six dollars plus additional charges imposed by the federal bureau of investigation that are passed on to the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of the license.The fee shall be distributed as follows:(i) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;(ii) Four dollars shall be paid to the agency taking the fingerprints of the person licensed;(iii) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter;(iv) Two dollars and sixteen cents to the firearms range account in the general fund; ((and))(v) Eighty-four cents to the concealed pistol license renewal notification account created in RCW 43.79.540; and(vi) One hundred dollars to the juvenile firearm early intervention services account created in section 4 of this act.(b) The nonrefundable fee for the renewal of such license shall be one hundred thirty-two dollars. No other branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the renewal of the license.The renewal fee shall be distributed as follows:(i) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;(ii) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter;(iii) Two dollars and sixteen cents to the firearms range account in the general fund; ((and))(iv) Eighty-four cents to the concealed pistol license renewal notification account created in RCW 43.79.540; and(v) One hundred dollars to the juvenile firearm early intervention services account created in section 4 of this act.(c) The nonrefundable fee for replacement of lost or damaged licenses is ten dollars to be paid to the issuing authority.(d) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the option of the issuing authority.(7)(a) A licensee may renew a license if the licensee applies for renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the license. A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license must pay a late renewal penalty of ten dollars in addition to the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section. The fee shall be distributed as follows:(i) Three dollars shall be deposited in the limited fish and wildlife account and used exclusively first for the printing and distribution of a pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety, and the preemptive nature of state law, and subsequently the support of volunteer instructors in the basic firearms safety training program conducted by the department of fish and wildlife. The pamphlet shall be given to each applicant for a license; and(ii) Seven dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.(b) Beginning with concealed pistol licenses that expire on or after August 1, 2018, the department of licensing shall mail a renewal notice approximately ninety days before the license expiration date to the licensee at the address listed on the concealed pistol license application, or to the licensee's new address if the licensee has notified the department of licensing of a change of address. Alternatively, if the licensee provides an email address at the time of license application, the department of licensing may send the renewal notice to the licensee's email address. The notice must contain the date the concealed pistol license will expire, the amount of renewal fee, the penalty for late renewal, and instructions on how to renew the license.(8) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) through (7) of this section, the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of the applicant's residence may issue a temporary emergency license for good cause pending review under subsection (1) of this section. However, a temporary emergency license issued under this subsection shall not exempt the holder of the license from any records check requirement. Temporary emergency licenses shall be easily distinguishable from regular licenses.(9) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the requirements of this section or chapter, nor may a political subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not required by this section.(10) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding citizenship or identity on an application for a concealed pistol license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the concealed pistol license of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and the person shall be permanently ineligible for a concealed pistol license.(11) A person may apply for a concealed pistol license:(a) To the municipality or to the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in a municipality;(b) To the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in an unincorporated area; or(c) Anywhere in the state if the applicant is a nonresident.(12) Any person who, as a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, is unable to renew a license under subsection (7) of this section because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service may renew the license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service, if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if appropriate, a copy of the person's discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order back to this state. A license renewed under this subsection shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license under this subsection shall pay only the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section and shall not be required to pay a late renewal penalty in addition to the renewal fee.(13)(a) By October 1, 2019, law enforcement agencies that issue concealed pistol licenses shall develop and implement a procedure for the renewal of concealed pistol licenses through a mail application process, and may develop an online renewal application process, for any person who, as a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, is unable to renew a license under subsection (7) of this section because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service.(b) A person applying for a license renewal under this subsection shall:(i) Provide a copy of the person's original order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service;(ii) Apply for renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the license; and(iii) Pay the renewal licensing fee under subsection (6) of this section, and, if applicable, the late renewal penalty under subsection (7) of this section.(c) A license renewed under this subsection takes effect on the expiration date of the prior license and is valid for a period of one year.(14) Not later than one year after May 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, issuing authorities shall submit aggregate license application data as set forth in this section to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program for statewide analysis of the uniformity of the licensing system and any potential demographic disparities. Not later than 18 months after May 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall submit to the state legislature a report that includes all of the following information, to the extent available, regarding concealed pistol licenses for the preceding year:(a) The number of license applications submitted, issued, and denied;(b) Aggregate and anonymized demographic data on the number of applicants seeking licenses that were issued, including race, gender, date of birth, and county of residence;(c) Aggregate and anonymized demographic data on the number of applicants seeking licenses that were denied, including race, gender, date of birth, and county of residence;(d) The frequency with which licenses were denied for each of the statutory disqualifying factors listed in this section;(e) The number of license denial decisions appealed by license applicants and the disposition of those appeals;(f) The number of issued licenses revoked; and(g) Information on the barriers, if any, to compiling and analyzing the information listed in (a) through (f) of this subsection.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:(1) The juvenile firearm early intervention services account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may only be used for services or conditions identified in section 1 of this act for individuals participating in the juvenile firearm early intervention alternative described in section 1 of this act.(2) Revenues to the juvenile firearm early intervention services account consist of:(a) Moneys deposited in this account pursuant to RCW 9.41.070; and(b) Funds appropriated by the legislature or other funds from public and private sources.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. Section 2 of this act expires May 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Section 3 of this act takes effect May 1, 2027.--- END ---